Illinois, session 104th, HB1739.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Dental Practice Act is amended by 5changing Section 4, 7, and 20 and by adding Sections 6.5 and 611.5 as follows: 7    (225 ILCS 25/4)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2304)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)9    Sec. 4. Definitions. As used in this Act:10    "Address of record" means the designated address recorded 11by the Department in the applicant's or licensee's application 12file or license file as maintained by the Department's 13licensure maintenance unit. It is the duty of the applicant or 14licensee to inform the Department of any change of address and 15those changes must be made either through the Department's 16website or by contacting the Department. 17    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 18Professional Regulation.19    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 20Professional Regulation.21    "Board" means the Board of Dentistry.22    "Dentist" means a person who has received a general 23license pursuant to subsection paragraph (a) of Section 11 of   HB1739- 2 -LRB104 08218 AAS 18268 b1this Act and who may perform any intraoral and extraoral 2procedure required in the practice of dentistry and to whom is 3reserved the responsibilities specified in Section 17.4    "Dental hygienist" means a person who holds a license 5under this Act to perform dental services as authorized by 6Section 18.7    "Dental assistant" means an appropriately trained person 8who, under the supervision of a dentist, provides dental 9services as authorized by Section 17.10    "Expanded function dental assistant" means a dental 11assistant who has completed the training required by Section 1217.1 of this Act. 13    "Dental laboratory" means a person, firm, or corporation 14which:15        (i) engages in making, providing, repairing, or 16    altering dental prosthetic appliances and other artificial 17    materials and devices which are returned to a dentist for 18    insertion into the human oral cavity or which come in 19    contact with its adjacent structures and tissues; and20        (ii) utilizes or employs a dental technician to 21    provide such services; and22        (iii) performs such functions only for a dentist or 23    dentists.24    "Supervision" means supervision of a dental hygienist or a 25dental assistant requiring that a dentist authorize the 26procedure, remain in the dental facility while the procedure   HB1739- 3 -LRB104 08218 AAS 18268 b1is performed, and approve the work performed by the dental 2hygienist or dental assistant before dismissal of the patient, 3but does not mean that the dentist must be present at all times 4in the treatment room.5    "General supervision" means supervision of a dental 6hygienist requiring that the patient be a patient of record, 7that the dentist examine the patient in accordance with 8Section 18 prior to treatment by the dental hygienist, and 9that the dentist authorize the procedures which are being 10carried out by a notation in the patient's record, but not 11requiring that a dentist be present when the authorized 12procedures are being performed. The issuance of a prescription 13to a dental laboratory by a dentist does not constitute 14general supervision.15    "Public member" means a person who is not a health 16professional. For purposes of board membership, any person 17with a significant financial interest in a health service or 18profession is not a public member.19    "Dentistry" means the healing art which is concerned with 20the examination, diagnosis, treatment planning, and care of 21conditions within the human oral cavity and its adjacent 22tissues and structures, as further specified in Section 17.23    "Branches of dentistry" means the various specialties of 24dentistry which, for purposes of this Act, shall be limited to 25the following: endodontics, oral and maxillofacial surgery, 26orthodontics and dentofacial orthopedics, pediatric dentistry,   HB1739- 4 -LRB104 08218 AAS 18268 b1periodontics, prosthodontics, oral and maxillofacial 2radiology, and dental anesthesiology.3    "Specialist" means a dentist who has received a specialty 4license pursuant to subsection (b) of Section 11 11(b).5    "Dental technician" means a person who owns, operates, or 6is employed by a dental laboratory and engages in making, 7providing, repairing, or altering dental prosthetic appliances 8and other artificial materials and devices which are returned 9to a dentist for insertion into the human oral cavity or which 10come in contact with its adjacent structures and tissues.11    "Denture" means any removable full or partial upper or 12lower prosthetic dental appliance to be worn in the human 13mouth to replace any missing natural teeth.14    "Denturist" means a person licensed under Section 11.5 to 15engage in the practice of denture technology and who is 16authorized within the person's scope of practice to provide to 17the public full or partial upper or lower dentures or other 18removable nonorthodontic dental appliances intended to be worn 19in the human mouth.20    "Practice of denture technology" means:21        (1) constructing, repairing, relining, reproducing, 22    duplicating, supplying, fitting, or altering a denture or 23    other removable nonorthodontic dental appliance intended 24    to be worn in the human mouth with respect to which a 25    service is performed under paragraph (2); and26        (2) the following services when performed for a   HB1739- 5 -LRB104 08218 AAS 18268 b1    purpose listed in paragraph (1):2            (A) the taking of impressions;3            (B) the taking of bite registrations;4            (C) try-ins of dentures or other removable 5        nonorthodontic dental appliances intended to be worn 6        in the human mouth; and7            (D) insertions of dentures or other removable 8        nonorthodontic dental appliances intended to be worn 9        in the human mouth. 10    "Informed consent" means legally valid consent that is 11given by a patient or legal guardian, that is recorded in 12writing or digitally, that authorizes intervention or 13treatment services from the treating dentist, and that 14documents agreement to participate in those services and 15knowledge of the risks, benefits, and alternatives, including 16the decision to withdraw from or decline treatment. 17    "Impaired dentist" or "impaired dental hygienist" means a 18dentist or dental hygienist who is unable to practice with 19reasonable skill and safety because of a physical or mental 20disability as evidenced by a written determination or written 21consent based on clinical evidence, including deterioration 22through the aging process, loss of motor skills, abuse of 23drugs or alcohol, or a psychiatric disorder, of sufficient 24degree to diminish the person's ability to deliver competent 25patient care.26    "Nurse" means a registered professional nurse, a certified   HB1739- 6 -LRB104 08218 AAS 18268 b1registered nurse anesthetist licensed as an advanced practice 2registered nurse, or a licensed practical nurse licensed under 3the Nurse Practice Act.4    "Patient of record", except as provided in Section 17.2, 5means a patient for whom the patient's most recent dentist has 6obtained a relevant medical and dental history and on whom the 7dentist has performed a physical examination within the last 8year and evaluated the condition to be treated, including a 9review of the patient's most recent x-rays.10    "Dental responder" means a dentist or dental hygienist who 11is appropriately certified in disaster preparedness, 12immunizations, and dental humanitarian medical response 13consistent with the Society of Disaster Medicine and Public 14Health and training certified by the National Incident 15Management System or the National Disaster Life Support 16Foundation. 17    "Mobile dental van or portable dental unit" means any 18self-contained or portable dental unit in which dentistry is 19practiced that can be moved, towed, or transported from one 20location to another in order to establish a location where 21dental services can be provided.22    "Public health dental hygienist" means a hygienist who 23holds a valid license to practice in the State, has 2 years of 24full-time clinical experience or an equivalent of 4,000 hours 25of clinical experience, and has completed at least 42 clock 26hours of additional structured courses in dental education in   HB1739- 7 -LRB104 08218 AAS 18268 b1advanced areas specific to public health dentistry.2    "Public health setting" means a federally qualified health 3center; a federal, State, or local public health facility; 4Head Start; a special supplemental nutrition program for 5Women, Infants, and Children (WIC) facility; a certified 6school-based health center or school-based oral health 7program; a prison; or a long-term care facility.8    "Public health supervision" means the supervision of a 9public health dental hygienist by a licensed dentist who has a 10written public health supervision agreement with that public 11health dental hygienist while working in an approved facility 12or program that allows the public health dental hygienist to 13treat patients, without a dentist first examining the patient 14and being present in the facility during treatment, (1) who 15are eligible for Medicaid or (2) who are uninsured or whose 16household income is not greater than 300% of the federal 17poverty level. 18    "Teledentistry" means the use of telehealth systems and 19methodologies in dentistry and includes patient diagnosis, 20treatment planning, care, and education delivery for a patient 21of record using synchronous and asynchronous communications 22under an Illinois licensed dentist's authority as provided 23under this Act.24    "Moderate sedation" means a drug-induced depression of 25consciousness during which: (1) patients respond purposefully 26to verbal commands, either alone or accompanied by light   HB1739- 8 -LRB104 08218 AAS 18268 b1tactile stimulation; (2) no interventions are required to 2maintain a patient's airway and spontaneous ventilation is 3adequate; and (3) cardiovascular function is usually 4maintained.5    "Deep sedation" means a drug-induced depression of 6consciousness during which: (1) patients cannot be easily 7aroused, but respond purposefully following repeated or 8painful stimulation; (2) the ability to independently maintain 9ventilatory function may be impaired; (3) patients may require 10assistance in maintaining airways and spontaneous ventilation 11may be inadequate; and (4) cardiovascular function is usually 12maintained.13    "General anesthesia" means a drug-induced loss of 14consciousness during which: (1) patients are not arousable, 15even by painful stimulation; (2) the ability to independently 16maintain ventilatory function is often impaired; (3) patients 17often require assistance in maintaining airways and positive 18pressure ventilation may be required because of depressed 19spontaneous ventilation or drug-induced depression of 20neuromuscular function; and (4) cardiovascular function may be 21impaired.22    "Venipuncture" means the puncture of a vein as part of a 23medical procedure, typically to withdraw a blood sample or for 24an intravenous catheter for the administration of medication 25or fluids.26    "Enteral route of administration" means administration of   HB1739- 9 -LRB104 08218 AAS 18268 b1a drug that is absorbed through the gastrointestinal tract or 2through oral, rectal, or sublingual mucosa.3    "Parenteral route of administration" means administration 4of a drug by which the drug bypasses the gastrointestinal 5tract through intramuscular, intravenous, intranasal, 6submucosal, subcutaneous, or intraosseous methods. 7(Source: P.A. 102-93, eff. 1-1-22; 102-588, eff. 8-20-21; 8102-936, eff. 1-1-23; 103-425, eff. 1-1-24; 103-431, eff. 91-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-628, eff. 7-1-24; 103-902, 10eff. 8-9-24; revised 10-10-24.) 11    (225 ILCS 25/6.5 new)12    Sec. 6.5. Board of Denture Technology. 13    (a) There is created a Board of Denture Technology, which 14is composed of the following persons appointed by the 15Secretary: 4 must have practiced denture technology for a 16period of 5 or more years; one must be an dentist licensed 17under this Act; and 2 must be members of the public who do not 18possess the professional qualifications of other members and 19who are not a spouse, domestic partner, child, parent, or 20sibling of an active licensed denturist or dentist. The 21membership of the Board shall include only residents from 22various geographic areas of this State and shall include at 23least some graduates from various institutions of dental 24education in this State. In making appointments to the Board, 25the Secretary shall give due consideration to recommendations   HB1739- 10 -LRB104 08218 AAS 18268 b1by organizations of the dental profession in Illinois, 2including the Illinois State Dental Society, and shall 3promptly give due notice to such organizations of any vacancy 4in the membership of the Board.5    (b) The board shall annually elect a chairman and 6vice-chairman who shall be individuals who have practiced 7denture technology for a period of 5 or more years.8    (c) Terms for all members shall be for 4 years. Partial 9terms over 2 years in length shall be considered as full terms. 10A member may be reappointed for a successive term, but no 11member shall serve more than 2 full terms in his or her 12lifetime.13    (d) The Secretary may terminate the appointment of any 14member for cause which in the opinion of the Secretary 15reasonably justifies such termination. A vacancy in the 16membership of the Board shall not impair the right of a quorum 17to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the 18Board.19    (e) Any action to be taken by the Board under this Act may 20be authorized by resolution at any regular or special meeting, 21and each such resolution shall take effect immediately.22    (f) The Board shall meet at least quarterly. The members 23of the Board shall each receive as compensation a reasonable 24sum as determined by the Secretary for each day actually 25engaged in the duties of the office, and all legitimate and 26necessary expense incurred in attending the meetings of the   HB1739- 11 -LRB104 08218 AAS 18268 b1Board.2    (g) Members of the Board shall be immune from suit in any 3action based upon any disciplinary proceedings or other 4activities performed in good faith as members of the Board. 5    (225 ILCS 25/7)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2307)6    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)7    Sec. 7. Recommendations by the Board. The Secretary may 8consider the recommendations of the Board of Dentistry or the 9Board of Denture Technology in establishing guidelines for 10professional conduct, for the conduct of formal disciplinary 11proceedings brought under this Act, and for establishing 12guidelines for qualifications of applicants. Notice of 13proposed rulemaking shall be transmitted to the Board of 14Dentistry or the Board of Denture Technology and the 15Department shall review the response of the Board of Dentistry 16or the Board of Denture Technology and any recommendations 17made therein. The Department may, at any time, seek the expert 18advice and knowledge of the Board of Dentistry or the Board of 19Denture Technology on any matter relating to the 20administration or enforcement of this Act. The action or 21report in writing of a majority of the Board of Dentistry or 22the Board of Denture Technology shall be sufficient authority 23upon which the Secretary may act.24    Whenever the Secretary is satisfied that substantial 25justice has not been done either in an examination or in the   HB1739- 12 -LRB104 08218 AAS 18268 b1revocation, suspension or refusal to issue a license, the 2Secretary may order a reexamination or rehearing.3(Source: P.A. 97-1013, eff. 8-17-12.) 4    (225 ILCS 25/11.5 new)5    Sec. 11.5. Necessity for licensure of denturist. 6    (a) On or after January 1, 2026, unless a person holds an 7active license issued under this Section, a person may not:8        (1) engage, or offer to engage, in the practice of 9    denture technology; or10        (2) use in connection with the name of the person the 11    word "denturist" or any other words, letters, or 12    abbreviations or insignia tending to indicate that such 13    person is engaged in the practice of denture technology.14    (b) This Section does not apply to:15        (1) a person acting under the supervision of a 16    denturist.17        (2) the practice of dentistry or medicine by persons 18    authorized to do so by this State.19        (3) a student of denture technology in pursuit of 20    clinical studies under an approved school program, or a 21    person having met the formal educational requirements, who 22    is operating, for no more than 2 years, under the direct 23    supervision of a denturist or a licensed dentist in 24    pursuit of practical clinical experience as required for 25    licensure under this Act.  HB1739- 13 -LRB104 08218 AAS 18268 b1    (c) The Department shall issue a license to practice 2denture technology to an applicant who, in addition to 3submitting an application and paying the applicable fees 4established by rule:5        (1) provides to the Department official transcripts 6    verifying completion of an associate degree program in 7    denture technology, or the equivalent in formal, 8    post-secondary education, approved by the Department;9        (2) provides to the Department documentation of 1,000 10    hours of supervised clinical practice in denture 11    technology, completed while enrolled in or after having 12    completed a course of study offered in a post-secondary 13    educational institution, or through equivalent supervised 14    experience, as determined by the Department;15        (3) passes a written and a practical examination 16    prescribed, recognized, or approved by the Board of 17    Denture Technology. An applicant who fails the practical 18    examination must complete additional hours of clinical and 19    laboratory training in an approved work experience 20    program, as determined by the Board of Denture Technology, 21    to qualify for reexamination; and22        (4) meets other requirements established by the 23    Department by rule.24    The educational program required by paragraph (1) of this 25subsection (c) must include pertinent courses in anatomy, 26including histology, microbiology, physiology, pharmacology,   HB1739- 14 -LRB104 08218 AAS 18268 b1pathology emphasizing periodontology, dental materials, 2medical emergencies, geriatrics, professional ethics, clinical 3denture technology and denture laboratory technology. The 4board may accept educational training obtained in any other 5state or country if, upon review of satisfactory evidence, the 6Department determines that the educational program in the 7other state or country meets the educational standards 8prescribed in this Section.9    An applicant meets the requirements of paragraph (1) or 10(2) of this subsection if the applicant provides the 11Department with documentation of military training or 12experience that the Department determines is substantially 13equivalent to the training or experience required by 14subsection (1) or (2) of this subsection.15    The Department may adopt rules providing for waiver of the 16practical examination requirement.17    (d) The Department may adopt rules allowing for issuance 18of a temporary license to practice denture technology.19    (e) Examinations of applicants for licensure under this 20Section shall be held at least once a year at such times and 21places as the State Board of Denture Technology may determine. 22Timely and appropriate notice shall be given to each 23applicant. The examination shall be sufficiently thorough to 24determine the qualifications, fitness, and ability of the 25applicant to practice denture technology. The examination may 26be in the form of written, oral, or practical demonstration of   HB1739- 15 -LRB104 08218 AAS 18268 b1skills, or a combination of any such types. The examination 2shall cover at least subjects listed in subsection (c) and any 3additional subjects required by the Department by rule that 4are based on changes in industry technology, health care 5delivery systems, client safety, or scientific infection 6control techniques.7    (f) The Department may issue a license to practice denture 8technology, without examination, to any person who:9        (1) submits an application and pays the applicable 10    fees established by rule;11        (2) has satisfied the educational requirements of this 12    Section;13        (3) is a denturist licensed under the laws of any 14    other state, the District of Columbia, Canada, or a 15    territory of the United States, and the standards for 16    licensing of denturists in the licensing jurisdiction are 17    determined by the Department to be substantially 18    equivalent to those of this Section;19        (4) has passed a written and practical examination 20    that the Department determines to be substantially 21    equivalent to the examination required for licensure in 22    this State; and23        (5) has engaged in the full-time active practice of 24    denture technology as a licensed denturist in another 25    jurisdiction for a minimum of 2 years immediately 26    preceding the date of application for licensure under this   HB1739- 16 -LRB104 08218 AAS 18268 b1    Section. 2    (225 ILCS 25/20)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2320)3    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)4    Sec. 20. Display of licenses. Any person licensed to 5practice dentistry, denture technology, or dental hygiene in 6this State by the Department as hereinbefore provided, shall 7at all times display such license or duplicate original 8thereof in a conspicuous place, in his or her office wherein he 9or she shall practice such profession, and shall further, 10whenever requested, exhibit such license to any of the members 11of the Department or its authorized agent. Upon proof by 12affidavit, the Department shall provide a duplicate if such 13person establishes that his or her license is lost or stolen or 14that he or she practices at multiple locations.15(Source: P.A. 89-80, eff. 6-30-95; 89-116, eff. 7-7-95.) 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.